Utah statutes.
58-60-305.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  All applicants for licensure as marriage and family therapists shall:

(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  produce certified transcripts evidencing completion of a masters or doctorate degree in marriage and family therapy from:

(i)  a program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education; or

(ii)  an accredited institution meeting criteria for approval established by rule under Section 58-1-203;

(e)  have completed a minimum of 4,000 hours of marriage and family therapy training as defined by division rule under Section 58-1-203, in not less than two years, under the supervision of a marriage and family therapist supervisor who meets the requirements of Section 58-60-307, and obtained after completion of the education requirement in Subsection (1)(d);

(f)  document successful completion of not less than 1,000 hours of supervised training in mental health therapy obtained after completion of the education requirement described in Subsection (1)(d)(i) or (1)(d)(ii), which training may be included as part of the 4,000 hours of training described in Subsection (1)(e), and of which documented evidence demonstrates not less than 100 of the supervised hours were obtained during direct, personal supervision by a marriage and family therapist supervisor qualified under Section 58-60-307, as defined by rule; and

(g)  pass the examination requirement established by division rule under Section 58-1-203.

(2) (a)  All applicants for licensure as an associate marriage and family therapist shall comply with the provisions of Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), and (d).

(b)  An individual's license as an associate marriage and family therapist is limited to the period of time necessary to complete clinical training as described in Subsections (1)(e) and (f) and extends not more than one year from the date the minimum requirement for training is completed, unless the individual presents satisfactory evidence to the division and the appropriate board that the individual is making reasonable progress toward passing of the qualifying examination for that profession or is otherwise on a course reasonably expected to lead to licensure, but the period of time under this Subsection (2)(b) may not exceed two years past the date the minimum supervised clinical training requirement has been completed.



Amended by Chapter 16, 2013 General Session

